Missouri, session 2026, HB1999.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 116.040 and 116.080, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 116.040 and 116.080, to read as follows:
116.040. The following shall be substantially the form of each page of each petition
for any law or amendment to the Constitution of the state of Missouri proposed by the
initiative:
County ______
Page No. ______
It is a class A misdemeanor punishable, notwithstanding the provisions
of section [560.021] 558.002, RSMo, to the contrary, for a term of
imprisonment not to exceed one year in the county jail or a fine not to
exceed ten thousand dollars or both, for anyone to sign any initiative
petition with any name other than his or her own, or knowingly to sign
his or her name more than once for the same measure for the same
election, or to sign a petition when such person knows he or she is not a
registered voter.
INITIATIVE PETITION
To the Honorable ______, Secretary of State for the state of Missouri:
We, the undersigned, registered voters of the state of Missouri and ___
___ County (or City of St. Louis), respectfully order that the following
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1999 2
proposed law (or amendment to the constitution) shall be submitted to
the voters of the state of Missouri, for their approval or rejection, at the
general election to be held on the ______ day of ______, ______, and
each for himself or herself says: I have personally signed this petition; I
am a registered voter of the state of Missouri and ______ County (or
City of St. Louis); my registered voting address and the name of the
city, town or village in which I live are correctly written after my name.
(Official Ballot title) ______
CIRCULATOR'S AFFIDAVIT
State Of Missouri,
County Of ______
I, ______, being first duly sworn, say (print or type names of signers)
REGISTERED
DATE VOTING ZIP CONGR.
NAME SIGNED ADDRESS CODE DIST. NAME
(Signature) (Street) (City, (Printed or
Town or
Village) Typed)
(Here follow numbered lines for signers)
signed this page of the foregoing petition, and each of them signed his
or her name thereto in my presence; I believe that each has stated his or
her name, registered voting address and city, town or village correctly,
and that each signer is a registered voter of the state of Missouri and __
____ County.
FURTHERMORE, I HEREBY SWEAR OR AFFIRM UNDER
PENALTY OF PERJURY THAT ALL STATEMENTS MADE BY ME
ARE TRUE AND CORRECT AND THAT I HAVE NEVER BEEN
CONVICTED OF, FOUND GUILTY OF, OR PLED GUILTY TO
ANY OFFENSE INVOLVING FORGERY.
I am at least 18 years of age. [I do ______ do not ______ (check one)
expect to be paid for circulating this petition. If paid, list the payer ___
___]
_______________
Signature of Affiant
(Person obtaining signatures)
_______________

HB 1999 3
(Printed Name of Affiant)
_______________
Address of Affiant
Subscribed and sworn to before me this ______ day of ______, A.D. _
_____
_______________
Signature of Notary
Address of Notary
Notary Public (Seal)
My commission expires ______

If this form is followed substantially and the requirements of section 116.050 and section
116.080 are met, it shall be sufficient, disregarding clerical and merely technical errors.
116.080. 1. Each petition circulator shall be at least eighteen years of age and
registered with the secretary of state. Signatures collected by any circulator who has not
registered with the secretary of state pursuant to this chapter on or before 5:00 p.m. on the
final day for filing petitions with the secretary of state shall not be counted. A petition
circulator shall be deemed registered at the time such circulator delivers a signed circulator's
affidavit pursuant to section 116.030, with respect to a referendum petition, or section
116.040, with respect to an initiative petition, to the office of the secretary of state. No person
shall qualify as a petition circulator who has been convicted of, found guilty of, or pled guilty
to an offense involving forgery under the laws of this state or an offense under the laws of any
other jurisdiction if that offense would be considered forgery under the laws of this state.
Circulators for initiative petitions shall not be paid.
2. Each petition circulator shall subscribe and swear to the proper affidavit on each
petition page such circulator submits before a notary public commissioned in Missouri.
When notarizing a circulator's signature, a notary public shall sign his or her official signature
and affix his or her official seal to the affidavit only if the circulator personally appears before
the notary and subscribes and swears to the affidavit in his or her presence.
3. Any circulator who falsely swears to a circulator's affidavit knowing it to be false is
guilty of a class A misdemeanor punishable, notwithstanding the provisions of section
[560.021] 558.002 to the contrary, for a term of imprisonment not to exceed one year in the
county jail or a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars or both.
✔